Georgia, session 2025_26, HB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 4 of Article 13 of Chapter 6 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to mopeds, is amended by revising Code Section 40-6-351, relating to driver's
license or permit required for certain operators, as follows:
"40-6-351.
(a) No person under 15 years of age shall operate a moped upon the highways in of this
state.
(b) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways in of this state unless he or she has
in his or her possession a valid driver's license, instruction permit, or limited permit issued
to him or her pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title; provided, however, that all classes of
H. B. 494
- 1 -

LC 39 4607
licenses, instruction permits, or limited permits issued pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title
shall be valid for the purposes of operating mopeds upon the highways in of this state.
(c) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways of this state unless such moped
is covered by a form of financial responsibility which provides for the ability to respond
in damages for liability on account of accidents in the amounts specified in
subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 33-7-11."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 494
- 2 -